Montana, session 2025, LC2205.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Public policy concerning climate change. (1) The legislature finds that
it is necessary to adopt a public policy regarding climate change.
(2) The legislature finds:
(a) human carbon dioxide emissions have insignificant effect on the carbon dioxide level in the
atmosphere and no measurable effect on climate or weather events;
(b) the carbon dioxide level does not control global temperature;
(c) global temperature controls the carbon dioxide level; and
(d) nature, not human activity, controls the climate.
(3) The legislature further finds:
(a) when providing educational and informational materials on climate change, the findings in
subsection (2) must be offered; and
(b) tax incentives that intend to alter human behavior in response to climate change claims are
useless, unnecessary, and an inappropriate use of limited state resources.
(4) On or before September 15 of even-numbered years and in accordance with 5-11-210:
(a) the superintendent of public instruction shall provide a report to the education interim
committee regarding climate change curriculum offered in Montana's public schools;
(b) the commissioner of higher education shall provide a report to the education interim committee
regarding climate change curriculum taught in Montana's public universities; and
(c) the department of revenue shall provide a report to the revenue interim committee and the
transportation interim committee on the use of tax incentives intended to alter human behavior in response to
climate change claims, including but not limited to tax deductions provided in accordance with 15-32-103 and
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC2205.1
other related tax incentives included in 15-6-157, 15-6-224, 15-6-225, and 15-24-3111.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 75, chapter 2, and the provisions of Title 75, chapter 2, apply to [section 1].

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 6 - Authorized Print Version – ****